Nebraska, session 109, LB68.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB68 LB68
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, any individual or
group sickness and accident insurance policy, certificate, or subscriber
contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for
policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited
benefit coverage, and any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent
not preempted under federal law, that includes coverage for a self-
administered hormonal contraceptive approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration shall reimburse an in-network health care provider or
dispensing entity on a per-unit basis for dispensing a supply of such
contraceptive to a covered individual as follows:
(a) For the first prescription of such contraceptive, up to a three-
month supply, if so prescribed; and
(b) For subsequent refills of the same contraceptive, regardless of
whether the covered individual was enrolled in the policy, certificate,
contract, or plan at the time of the first prescription for such
contraceptive, up to a twelve-month supply, if so prescribed.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Require a health care provider to prescribe a twelve-month
supply of a self-administered hormonal contraceptive; or
(b) Permit a policy, certificate, contract, or plan to impose cost-
sharing for an alternative method of contraception if a covered
individual changes contraceptive methods before exhausting a previously
dispensed supply of a self-administered hormonal contraceptive.
Sec. 2. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 3. (1) In providing family planning services and supplies
under the medical assistance program, the department shall ensure that a
prescription for the one-time dispensation of a twelve-month supply of a
-2-

LB68 LB68
2025 2025
covered self-administered hormonal contraceptive is provided as
prescribed.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a medical
assistance recipient's freedom to choose or change a method of family
planning, whether or not the recipient has exhausted a previously
dispensed supply of contraceptives.
Sec. 4. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-